New Jersey, session 222, A3862.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, the Catastrophic Illness in Children Relief Fund Commission shall exclude from the income of a parent or legal guardian applying to the Catastrophic Illness in Children Relief Fund program up to $15,000 in donations made to the parent or legal guardian by members of their community to assist with family living expenses, for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the parent or legal guardian for the payment or reimbursement of medical expenses for a child with a catastrophic illness. b.    As used in this section, family living expenses means expenses for travel, lodging, meals, and other reasonable and necessary costs associated with the care of a child with a catastrophic illness. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.